Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Property and Buildings Commission
56.510.
Payment of costs — Conveyance of title of industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project — Acquisition of public project by state — Lease agreement or financing agreements.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and in providing for the expenditure of funds for the acquisition of real estate or for a building project for the state or for any state agency, the cabinet may find that the cost may be paid in whole or in part:

Out of the funds appropriated specifically for capital outlay purposes;

Out of funds directly appropriated to the involved state agency which may legally be available for the purpose;

Out of funds derived or which may be derived by the issuance and sale of revenue bonds by the commission (but only for the purpose of acquiring property for use by the state government or one of its departments or agencies, but not including any independent municipal corporation or political subdivision); or

By any one (1) or a combination of said methods of financing. Any such findings providing for the issuance and sale of bonds shall be submitted to the commission for final determination. When any funds appropriated to or standing to the credit of a particular state agency are to be used for a purpose of the character above contemplated, the head of the agency may direct that the funds be transferred to the credit of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and made available for expenditure by the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the agreed purpose. Industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology projects may be financed by the issuance of revenue bonds of the commission only at the request of the Cabinet for Economic Development, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

In any case where the expenditures for the acquisition of real estate or for a building project for the state or any state agency are to be financed in whole or in part by the issuance or sale of revenue bonds, the commission may provide that the title to any real estate which may be so acquired shall not vest in the Commonwealth until the revenue bonds, together with interest thereon, have been paid in full. In such cases the commission may, by agreement or in a trust indenture securing the payment of such revenue bonds, provide that the title of such real estate may be vested in some other state agency, or in a trustee named in such indenture, until the revenue bonds, together with the interest thereon, have been paid in full. It shall be provided in any such financing:

That upon the retirement and discharge of the bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the commission at the direction of and on behalf of a state agency, title to the public project or public projects so acquired shall vest in the Commonwealth;

That in the event of default with respect to such bonds, notes, or other obligations, the Commonwealth shall have the exclusive option to acquire the public project or public projects for the amount required to discharge such bonds, notes, or other obligations, and is provided a reasonable time to exercise such option;

That the issuance of such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be directed by and approved by such state agency not more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of issue of such obligations; and

That no bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be issued by the commission for and on behalf of such state agency except upon express direction of such state agency.

In any case where the expenditures for the acquisition, installation and construction of an industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project will be financed in whole or in part by the issuance or sale of revenue bonds, the commission may provide that the title to the industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project which may be so acquired shall be conveyed to the entity which will occupy and utilize the industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project; provided, however, that such conveyance shall only be made if:

The subject entity agrees in writing prior to the issuance of any revenue bonds to construct and acquire in connection with the industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project facilities satisfactory to the commission;

The commission makes a finding in writing, that, based upon diligent investigation, the aggregate incremental taxes to be received by the Commonwealth as a result of such project are reasonably expected, over the life of the revenue bond issue, to be at least equal to the principal amount of any revenue bonds issued to finance such project;

The industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project is separately approved in writing by the Governor;

The industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project is separately approved and authorized by the General Assembly; and

Any revenue bond proceedings for the financing of an industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project provide that in the event of any disposition by an entity of any such project previously conveyed to such industrial, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology entity prior to the collection by the Commonwealth of incremental taxes in the amount specified in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, the subject industrial, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology entity shall pay to the Commonwealth an amount equal to the difference between the aggregate incremental taxes collected by the Commonwealth to such date of disposition and the principal amount of such revenue bonds;

As an alternate to the initial conveyance of an industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project to an entity, such project may be leased to such entity upon such terms as the commission and the Cabinet for Economic Development shall determine to be proper, and in such case, subject to the provisions of subparagraphs 1., 2., and 3. of paragraph (a) of this subsection, provision may also be made for title to such project to be conveyed to the subject entity at such time as the Commonwealth has collected incremental taxes in respect of the project in an amount equal to the principal amount of any revenue bonds issued to finance such industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project;

It is hereby determined and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the provisions and requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection provide for the receipt by the Commonwealth of fair market value for any industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project conveyed to an entity pursuant to this subsection; and

The Cabinet for Economic Development is authorized and empowered to initiate industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology projects and to finance such projects pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. When revenue bonds are issued for the financing of any such project, the Cabinet for Economic Development is authorized and empowered to enter into financing agreements or lease agreements with the commission providing for the making of financing payments by the Cabinet for Economic Development from appropriations made to the Cabinet for Economic Development as, if and when received, for the amortization of revenue bonds so issued, provided that no such obligation shall be binding upon the Cabinet for Economic Development for a period extending beyond the legislative biennium during which such obligation is incurred, but such obligation may be renewed during successive biennial periods by the Cabinet for Economic Development. The issuance of any revenue bonds, notes or other obligations for the financing of industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology projects shall be directed by and approved by the Cabinet for Economic Development not more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of the issue of such obligations, and no bonds, notes or other obligations shall be issued by the commission for and on behalf of the Cabinet for Economic Development, except upon such express direction and upon compliance with this subsection. Any portion of an industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project may be financed by a city or county of the Commonwealth in the same manner as a financing by the commission under this section, KRS

56.513

and

56.514

or pursuant to the statutory authority of such city or county. In such event, the Cabinet for Economic Development may enter into similar financing agreements or lease agreements with such city or county in order to make proper provision for such financing.

The cabinet, in providing for the expenditure of funds for any of the purposes mentioned in this section, or the commission in providing for the issuance and sale of revenue bonds, shall have power to provide by agreement with the state agency affected, or by provision in the trust indenture securing the bonds, such terms and conditions as may be considered appropriate and reasonable so as to permit either the leasing to, and use by, any state agency of any building project or the conveyance or lease of any industrial, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology development project to any entity, any such building project to be paid for by such state agency either:

From its own appropriation;

By the issuance of revenue bonds; or

By means of a proposal to pay a rental for the use of all or any part of any building proposed to be constructed and any such industrial, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology development project to be paid for by the Cabinet for Economic Development by the issuance of revenue bonds of the commission, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, and amortization of such revenue bonds by the Cabinet for Economic Development.

The cabinet or the commission, in making any such lease agreement or financing agreement, or in making provision in any trust indenture securing revenue bonds, is authorized and empowered to lease all or any part of the facility financed for such term and upon such conditions and for such considerations or enter into financing agreements with the Cabinet for Economic Development in respect of any industrial development, headquarters, or nonretail service and technology project as may appear to be in the public interest.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 8; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 9; 1976, ch. 205, § 3, effective October 1, 1976; 1986, ch. 350, § 3, effective April 8, 1986; 2018 ch. 199, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

56.513.
Interim financing — Revenue bond anticipation notes — Loan agreements — Tax status.

When the State Property and Buildings Commission makes a determination, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, that one (1) or more building projects or industrial development projects will be financed by the issuance of revenue bonds, then in anticipation of such financing the commission may borrow money to provide interim financing therefor and issue in evidence thereof its revenue bond anticipation notes, bearing interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum rate permitted for the issuance of such bonds. Such interim financing may be entered into for the commission’s own projects, for those of the University of Kentucky and the state colleges or universities or for any other agency of the Commonwealth where approval by the commission is required regarding the issuance of revenue bonds of such an agency. In instances where the revenue bonds involved are to be issued by other agencies, such agencies, with the prior approval of the commission, may borrow money in the same manner and for the same purpose and issue in evidence thereof their own revenue bond anticipation notes, according to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

The commission shall solicit proposals for such interim financing from at least three (3) responsible lenders, and shall select in its discretion the best of such proposals consistent with sound financial practices. A selection may be made even though less than three (3) proposals are received. The term of any such revenue bond anticipation note shall not exceed five (5) years; and the same may be renewed, if necessary.

Each revenue bond anticipation note may include prepayment provisions which will allow the commission or other borrowing agency to prepay the loan after giving reasonable notice to the lender; shall identify the revenue bond issue from the proceeds of which the note or notes and any interest thereon are to be paid; and shall include a statement that the note is being issued in anticipation of the identified revenue bond issue, and that neither the note, nor the interest thereon, shall constitute or evidence an indebtedness of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Each such note and the interest thereon (to any extent not previously paid from other sources) shall be paid from the proceeds of the identified revenue bond issue, when such proceeds have been received and are available.

Instead of borrowing money and issuing revenue bond anticipation notes in the full amount necessary for construction contract purposes, the commission (or such agencies with the prior approval of the commission and according to its rules and regulations), may enter into loan agreements with one (1) or more lenders (determined by the commission to be responsible) according to the terms of which it may be agreed:

That the lender will continuously make available to the borrowing agency a stated maximum amount of money for a stated period of time;

That the borrowing agency may demand and obtain cash advances against such commitment from time to time upon reasonable and agreed notice, and upon issuing in evidence of each advance a bond anticipation note which will bear an agreed rate of interest, not exceeding the maximum rate permitted for the issuance of the proposed bonds; and

That in consideration of the making of such loan agreement the borrowing agency will pay to the lender or lenders a commitment fee determined by the commission to be reasonable according to financial conditions existing at the time the loan agreement is made.

Such loan agreements may be recorded as receivables upon the books of account of the commission, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or other borrowing agency, and construction contracts may be awarded against the same to the amount of money which the lender contractually agrees to make available to the borrowing agency, the same as in the case of loan agreements made with departments or agencies of the United States government.

Each revenue bond anticipation note issued according to this section, and the receipt of interest thereon, shall be exempt from all taxation by the Commonwealth and all of its subdivisions, municipalities, and taxing authorities; and this may be stated as a representation in the text of each such revenue bond anticipation note.

The State Property and Building Commission and other state agencies authorized to issue revenue bond anticipation notes under the terms of this section may, as an alternative and if authorized to do so by the governing body of such commission or agency, adopt the procedures for interim financing established for counties, cities, and other municipal corporations, or their agencies, by KRS

58.150

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 137, §
1; 1968, ch. 110, §
1; 1970, ch. 152, §
1; 1986, ch. 350, §
4, effective April 8, 1986; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 287, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Note, Facing the Economic Challenges of the Eighties — the Kentucky Constitution and Hayes v. The State Property and Buildings Commission of Kentucky,
15 N. Ky. L. Rev. 645 (1988).

56.514.
Types of bonds issuable to finance industrial development projects or building projects — Terms — Issuance — Marketing — Refunding.

The following provisions shall be applicable to commission financing to carry out the purposes of this chapter:

As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Commercial paper revenue bonds” means revenue bond anticipation notes which by their terms mature not more than two hundred seventy (270) days from the date of issuance thereof and are to be refunded by the issuance of commercial paper revenue bonds or by refunding revenue bonds; provided, however, that all commercial paper revenue bonds must possess the characteristics set forth and described in subsection (3)(d) of this section;

“Refunding revenue bonds” means revenue bonds issued by the commission to refund outstanding issues of revenue bonds, commercial paper revenue bonds and variable rate revenue bonds; and

“Variable rate revenue bonds” means revenue bonds the rate of interest on which fluctuates either automatically by reference to predetermined formulas and indices or pursuant to the standards set forth in subsection (3)(e) of this section.

The commission may issue and sell revenue or other authorized bonds, including variable rate and commercial paper bonds, to pay all or any part of the expense or cost of or incidental to an industrial development project, or a building project in denominations and amounts, as it deems to be for the best interest of the Commonwealth.

Revenue bonds issued to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects may bear interest at any rate or rates, either fixed or variable in accordance with such method as shall be determined by the commission, shall be payable either annually or at shorter intervals, may be of such terms and maturities, may bear such conversion privileges, may be executed by the manual or facsimile signatures of such officers of the commission, and shall be executed in such manner and at such time or times, or from time to time, and be payable at such times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof, or, if commercial paper, from the date of initial issuance thereof, and at such place or places as the commission determines;

Such revenue bonds may provide that they or any of them may be called for redemption prior to maturity under conditions determined by the commission before issuing the bonds;

Such revenue bonds may, at any time on or after the earliest redemption date provided therefor at the time of their issuance, be refunded by the commission, in such amount as the commission may deem necessary to refund the principal of the revenue bonds to be refunded, together with any unpaid interest thereon, to create any necessary debt service reserve fund, and to pay any premiums, expenses, and commissions required to be paid in connection therewith;

At the time of the initial issuance of commercial paper revenue bonds to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects, the commission may designate individual officials of any state agency as agents for purposes of approving the principal amount, the interest rate, the discount, if any, and the maturity date of revenue bonds being issued later to refund the maturing commercial paper revenue bonds; provided, however, that at the time of the initial issuance of any such commercial paper revenue bonds, the commission shall set the maximum principal amount, the maximum interest rate, and the maximum discount, if any, of the refunding revenue bonds plus the final maturity date of the last issue of such refunding revenue bonds; and provided further that the commission shall retain the right to revoke any such agent’s authority at any time and for any reason whatsoever. Individual issues of commercial paper revenue bonds, issued as part of a continuing financing program, may be refunded by the approvals of such agents of the commission;

At the time of issuance of variable rate revenue bonds to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects, the commission may designate individuals or institutions which in the sole judgment of the commission have financial market expertise to serve as agent for the commission for establishing and changing from time to time while such variable rate revenue bonds remain outstanding the rate of interest to be borne by and the price to be paid for such revenue bonds; provided, however, that the rate-setting procedures and authority of each such agent shall be set forth in writing, and may include a formula or an index or indices based upon market factors, and shall be established by the commission at the time of issuance of such revenue bonds; and provided further that at the time of the issuance of such revenue bonds, the commission shall establish the maximum interest rate to be borne by the revenue bonds; and provided further that the commission shall retain the right to remove or replace any such agent at any time and for any reason whatsoever;

Any revenue bonds issued and outstanding hereunder to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects and the interest due on such revenue bonds shall, prior to the maturity or redemption date thereof, be deemed to have been paid to the same extent as if they had actually been paid in cash and retired, if:

In the event any of such revenue bonds are to be redeemed on any date prior to their maturity, the commission shall have given a trustee appointed for the holders of such revenue bonds in connection with their issuance, in form satisfactory to such trustee and in conformity with the requirements of the resolution authorizing their issuance irrevocable instructions to give notice of redemption of such revenue bonds to the holders thereof by written notice which is satisfactory to such trustee;

There shall have been deposited with the trustee either money in an amount which shall be sufficient, or direct obligations of or obligations guaranteed by the United States of America, or other obligations specified by the commission, the principal of and the interest on which, when due, will provide money which, together with the money, if any, deposited with the trustee at the same time, shall be sufficient to pay when due the principal and the interest due and to become due on such revenue bonds on and prior to redemption date or maturity date thereof, as the case may be; and

In the event that such revenue bonds are not to be redeemed within the next succeeding sixty (60) days, the commission shall have given the trustee in form satisfactory to it irrevocable instructions to give, as soon as practicable, in a manner satisfactory to it, a notice to the holders of such revenue bonds that the deposit required by subparagraph 2. of this paragraph has been made with the trustee, that such revenue bonds are deemed to have been paid in accordance with the provisions hereof and stating such maturity or redemption date upon which money is to be available for the payment of the principal of and interest on such revenue bonds;

It is hereby declared and determined that the issuance of any and all refunding bonds as provided herein will be for a public purpose if the commission so declares in the proceedings authorizing same; and

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on revenue bonds issued to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects ceases to be such officer before delivery of the bonds, his signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until delivery. Any such revenue bonds issued to pay the costs of industrial development projects or building projects shall be sold upon such terms as the commission deems best, either at public or private sale, and for such price, as the commission may determine. In the event the revenue bonds are sold at private, negotiated sale, the commission shall publish in accordance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 424 a notice of the intent of the commission to negotiate the sale of such revenue bonds within thirty (30) days of such proposed sale, which notice shall include the identification and description of such revenue bonds, an estimate of the week during which the negotiated sale is expected to occur and the identity of the state officer or agency and the fiscal advisor or managing underwriter from whom further information regarding the revenue bonds may be obtained. Revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the commission under this chapter, the income thereon, and the transfer thereof, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be exempt from taxation or assessment of any type by the Commonwealth, its agencies and departments, and by all political subdivisions within the state. Nothing contained in this section shall preclude or prevent the authorization and issuance by the commission from time to time of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations, the receipt of interest on which may be subject to federal income taxation.

The payment of revenue bonds issued to pay the cost of an industrial development project or building project, together with the interest thereon, may be secured by a pledge of and a first lien on all of the receipts and revenue derived, or to be derived, from the rental, financing, or operation of the industrial development projects or building projects involved, including rentals and financing payments made by the Finance and Administration Cabinet from appropriated funds on a biennial basis, pursuant to lease agreements or financing agreements between the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the commission. Neither the payment of any revenue bond, nor the interest thereon, issued under the authority of this section shall constitute an indebtedness of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, nor shall any revenue bond or interest thereon be payable out of any fund except funds derived from rentals, financing payments, or other revenues derived from the operation of the industrial development projects or building projects or from revenues as are available for the purpose by law.

If revenue bonds are sold at public, competitive sale, the revenue bonds issued by the commission under the provisions of this section shall be sold after notice adequate to inform the public of the sale. Notice may include posting on the Internet or newspaper advertising.

If revenue bonds are sold at public, competitive sale, competitive bids for the sale of the revenue bonds shall be opened and read publicly by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the secretary’s representative at a designated place, day, and hour, all of which shall be announced in the notice made relative thereto.

All money from the sale of revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury and shall be credited to a special account to be designated as directed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and no part thereof shall be withdrawn from the State Treasury except for the purposes authorized by this chapter, together with the cost incidental to the issuing and selling of the revenue bonds and other expenses directly related thereto. The commission may provide in any trust indenture securing revenue bonds for additional terms and conditions thereof, or for other restrictions not in conflict with this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 350, § 5, effective April 8, 1986; 1988, ch. 395, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 120, § 25, effective July 15, 1998.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Note, Facing the Economic Challenges of the Eighties — the Kentucky Constitution and Hayes v. The State Property and Buildings Commission of Kentucky,
15 N. Ky. L. Rev. 645 (1988).

56.515.
Leaseback agreement for fairgrounds improvements.

When the cabinet finds that the purposes of the State Fair Board and the public purposes of the Commonwealth would be promoted by the construction of buildings and improvements on land in the custody of the State Fair Board as defined in KRS 247.140(1)(a), it may, in addition to any other method prescribed by law, authorize the construction of such buildings and improvements by private capital under a conveyance and leaseback agreement authorized by subsection (2) of this section, or under a mortgage agreement authorized by subsection (3) of this section.

The cabinet may convey the fee interest in any of the land described in subsection (1) of this section to a private individual, corporation, or partnership to which such land has been or will be leased, subject to a written agreement by such individual, corporation, or partnership to construct such buildings and improvements and to reconvey the fee interest to the Commonwealth subject to a mortgage placed on the fee interest by such individual, corporation, or partnership for the purpose of securing private financing for the construction of such buildings and improvements; provided, however, that such mortgage shall not constitute a general obligation or debt of the Commonwealth and that the Commonwealth may, in the event of default, redeem the mortgage if it so elects.

The cabinet may agree that a private individual, corporation, or partnership to which any of the land described in subsection (1) of this section has been leased may, in order to secure private financing for the construction of such buildings and improvements, have the right to grant against its leasehold interest a first mortgage lien in an amount sufficient to pay fully the costs of the construction of such buildings and improvements, to which all rights of the Commonwealth shall be subordinate and inferior; provided, however, that such first mortgage lien shall not constitute a general debt or obligation of the Commonwealth.

Any agreement made under this section shall be made only with the written consent of the State Fair Board and the State Property and Buildings Commission and shall be signed in the name of the Commonwealth by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Governor and shall be lodged for record in the Office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 140, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1976, ch. 76, § 1, effective March 29, 1976.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The proposal of a nonprofit corporation to lease a stadium for the purposes of renovation to create a facility suitable for a professional baseball team is specifically governed upon an affirmative finding by the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) that the purposes of the board and the public purposes of the Commonwealth would be promoted by the proposed renovation; thus, there is no requirement that a private lessee, using private capital, seek competitive bids for the contemplated construction.

OAG 81-341

.

56.520.
Revenue bonds — Investment of proceeds of authorized bonds.

The commission may issue and sell revenue or other authorized bonds, in carrying out the provisions of this chapter, in denominations and amounts, as is deemed to be for the best interest of the Commonwealth, for any of the following purposes:

To acquire real estate for state governmental use;

To pay all or any part of the expense or cost of or incidental to a building project for state governmental use;

To defray the cost of plans, specifications, blueprints, architectural fees, and other expenses authorized to be incurred for state governmental use.

The payment of bonds issued, together with the interest thereon, may be secured by a pledge and a first lien on all of the receipts and revenue derived, or to be derived, from the rental or operation of the property involved. Neither the payment of any bond, nor the interest thereon issued under the authority of this chapter, shall constitute an indebtedness of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, nor shall any bond or interest thereon be payable out of any fund except funds derived from rentals or other revenues derived from the operation of the properties or from revenues as are available for the purpose by law.

All competitive bids for the sale of revenue bonds shall be opened and read publicly by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or the secretary’s representative at a designated place, day, and hour, all of which shall be indicated in the notice made relative thereto.

If the commission issues and sells bonds for a building project as authorized by this chapter, insurance, including fire and windstorm, casualty, catastrophe, use and occupancy, and such other insurance as the commission may deem advisable, shall be carried in connection with the building project, and it may so obligate and bind itself in a trust indenture securing the payment of the bonds. Any insurance shall be paid for out of funds available for the project.

The commission may invest proceeds from the sale of its revenue or other authorized bonds in financial instruments and investments as provided in KRS

42.500

for the State Investment Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 9; 1956, ch. 90; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 10; 1962, ch. 15, § 3; 1968, ch. 110, § 2; 1968, ch. 152, § 22; 1976, ch. 205, § 4, effective October 1, 1976; 1988, ch. 395, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 277, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 291, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 288, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 554, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90). The two Acts amending this section prevail over the repeal and reenactment in House Bill 940, Acts Ch. 476, pursuant to Section 653(1) of Acts Ch. 476. Because there is a conflict between these two amending Acts, the amending Act which was last enacted by the General Assembly prevails, pursuant to KRS

446.250

.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 120, 207, and 554 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

56.523.
Refunding bonds.

The commission is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds outstanding that have been issued at any time under the provisions of KRS

56.520

or for the purpose of refunding any bonds outstanding that have been issued by agencies of the state under the provisions of KRS Chapter 58, including redemption premiums thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption. The commission is further authorized to issue bonds for the combined purpose of refunding any bonds issued at any time under KRS

56.520

or by state agencies under KRS Chapter 58, including redemption premiums thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption, and for paying the cost of extensions, improvements, betterments or additions to the project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 7, § 4.

56.527.
Revenues from bond projects, custody, investment, reports.

To the extent not inconsistent with the obligations and covenants of resolutions and trust indentures pursuant to which bonds have previously been issued and are outstanding, revenues from bond projects of all agencies of the state shall be paid into the State Treasury through the cabinet and the cabinet may, in the best interest of the project, invest and reinvest, or require a trustee to invest and reinvest, all funds held for the benefit of the project. In all instances the cabinet may, by regulations promulgated and made effective according to KRS Chapter 13A, require that all depositories, trustees, and other agents make periodic reports to the cabinet concerning the status of and balances in such funds, and the manner in which the same are invested and reinvested from time to time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 7, § 6.

56.530.
Abandonment of incompleted building projects — Settlement with architects, engineers, and contractors.

The commission may abandon, or cause to be abandoned, the construction of any building finally approved by it and may change the purposes for which such building is being constructed or for which contracts have been entered into or were commenced by the state or any state agency. Likewise the cabinet may abandon, or cause to be abandoned, the construction of any building finally approved by it and may change the purposes for which such building is being constructed or for which contracts have been entered into or were commenced by the state or any state agency. In either event the cabinet is authorized to make such equitable adjustment or settlement with the architects, engineers and contractors employed in connection with such construction as it may deem just and equitable. If there is an adjustment or settlement with said architects, engineers or contractors, the cabinet is authorized to pay the same, or to approve the payment thereof, from any of the funds set forth in KRS

56.510

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 10; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 11, effective July 1, 1956.

56.540.
Acts or actions taken by commission not invalidated — Cabinet may complete transactions.

The vesting in the cabinet by KRS

56.440

to

56.580

of any of the powers, duties or functions heretofore vested in the commission shall not have the effect of invalidating any acts or action heretofore taken by the commission; and the cabinet is authorized and directed to execute any conveyance or other writing or take whatever action may be necessary to complete any such transaction, the same as the commission could have done prior to the effective date of KRS

56.440

to

56.580

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 11; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 12, effective July 1, 1956.

56.550.
Applicability of KRS 56.440 to 56.540 to certain projects.

Nothing in KRS

56.440

to

56.540

shall be construed to apply to the construction of roads or bridges or the acquisition of rights-of-way or real estate in connection therewith now under the jurisdiction of the Department of Highways or the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky, or for any other expenditure made from the state road fund or by said turnpike authority.

Except as provided by KRS

56.467

,

162.520

to

162.620

, nothing in KRS

56.440

to

56.540

shall be construed to apply to school districts, or to affect the rights, powers, and duties of the governing authorities of such districts; provided, however, that the acquisition of sites, and the acquisition, purchase, construction, leasing, and operation of television or related facilities as an aid to education or as an aid to any other proper public function, shall be deemed to be matters of statewide jurisdiction and interest, and any or all of such activities on the part of the commission shall not be deemed to constitute encroachment upon the authority of any school district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (1st Extra. Sess.), ch. 11, §
12; 1962, ch. 15, §
4; 1964, ch. 7, §
10; 1970, ch. 204, §
9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, §
20(1); 1986, ch. 350, §
5, effective April 8, 1986; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 289, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Educational television, KRS Ch. 168.